Vermont, session 2025-2026, H755.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. § 2453 is amended to read:
§ 2453. PRACTICES PROHIBITED; ANTITRUST AND CONSUMER
PROTECTION
(a)(1) Unfair methods of competition in commerce and unfair or deceptive
acts or practices in commerce are hereby declared unlawful.
(2) It shall be unlawful for any person, partnership, or corporation to
disseminate, or cause to be disseminated, any false or misleading
advertisement. Advertisements shall be disseminated in language that is clear
and conspicuous.
(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that in construing subsection (a) of this
section, the courts of this State will be guided by the construction of similar
VT LEG #386691 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.755
2026 Page 2 of 2
terms contained in Section 5(a)(1) of the Federal Trade Commission Act as
from time to time amended by the Federal Trade Commission and the courts of
the United States.
(c) The Attorney General shall adopt rules, when necessary and proper to
carry out the purposes of this chapter, relating to unfair methods of competition
in commerce and unfair or deceptive acts or practices in commerce. The rules
shall not be inconsistent with the rules, regulations, and decisions of the
Federal Trade Commission and the federal courts interpreting the Federal
Trade Commission Act.
(d) Violation of a rule adopted by the Attorney General is prima facie proof
of the commission of an unfair or deceptive act in commerce.
(e) The provisions of subsections (a), (c), and (d) of this section shall also
be applicable to real estate transactions.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386691 v.1